Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.100

Prohibitions.

A county that adopts a program and designates a program region under this chapter may not:

(1) Make the issuance of a permit, license, or other authorization from the county to a person who owns property in the region contingent on the person entering into a written contract to repay the financing of a qualified project under this chapter; or

(2) Otherwise compel a person who owns property in the region to enter into a written contract to repay the financing of a qualified project under this chapter.

[ 2020 c 27 s 11.]